Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 21 Minority Business Development Compliance Act

37-21-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Minority Business Development Compliance Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 306, § 1.

37-21-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 306, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 1997.

37-21-3.
Use of minority business development compliance funding.

All sums appropriated for minority business development compliance account shall be used for the primary purpose of developing the monitoring and compliance functions relating to equal opportunity laws and the state’s minority business enterprise programs. The purpose of the program shall be to guarantee maximum minority business enterprise and minority workforce participation on state and federally funded construction projects, and to assure the fullest possible implementation of the state’s minority business enterprise procurement program.

Funds shall be used for compliance analysis, on-site monitoring, special studies, outreach to the minority business enterprise community, training and apprenticeship programs, general administration of the program, and related purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 12, § 15; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 37.

37-21-4, 37-21-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 306, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 1997.